Wisconsin, session 2025, AB22.
do enact as follows:AB22,11Section 1. 66.1105 (6) (g) 7. of the statutes is created to read:AB22,2,3266.1105 (6) (g) 7. This paragraph does not apply to Tax Incremental District 3Number 6 in the city of Middleton.AB22,24Section 2. 66.1105 (17) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB22,2,8566.1105 (17) (h) City of Middleton exception. The 12 percent limit described 6under sub. (4) (gm) 4. c. does not apply to the creation of Tax Incremental District 7Number 6 that is created by the common council of the city of Middleton if the 8district is created on or before June 1, 2025.AB22,2,99